Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-374
Rules and regulations; orders, rulings, demands, and findings.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders, rulings, demands, and findings to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 95.